Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-1401
Legislative findings and declarations.

The Legislature
finds and declares that:

(1) State government
has significant challenges to face. An ever-changing global economy, an aging
population, outmigration of educated young people, and constantly expanding
needs for services, among other issues, require that the Legislature consider
the long-term trends and factors affecting the welfare of Nebraskans and the
long-term implications of the decisions made by the members of the Legislature;

(2) It is necessary
for the Legislature to identify emerging trends, assets, and challenges of
the state;

(3) It is vital for Nebraska to have continuity in policy;

(4) It is necessary
to establish a process of long-term state planning within the Legislature;
and

(5) It is the duty of the Legislature to assess the long-range needs
of Nebraska and to adopt legislation which meets those needs.

Laws 2009, LB653, § 1.